Washington statutes.
RCW 35.42.090

Leases exempted from certain taxes.

All leases executed pursuant to RCW 35.42.010 through 35.42.090 shall be exempt from the tax imposed by chapter 19, Laws of 1951 second extraordinary session, as amended, and *chapter 82.45 RCW; section 5, chapter 389, Laws of 1955, and RCW 82.04.040; and section 9, chapter 178, Laws of 1941, and RCW 82.08.090, and by rules and regulations of the department of revenue issued pursuant thereto.

[ 1975 1st ex.s. c 278 s 22; 1965 c 7 s 35.42.090. Prior: 1959 c 80 s 9.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: This internal reference has been changed from chapter 28A.45 RCW to chapter 82.45 RCW in accordance with 1981 c 148 s 13 and 1981 c 93 s 2. See note following RCW 82.45.010.

Construction—Severability—1975 1st ex.s. c 278: See notes following RCW 11.08.160.